California, session 20252026, SB583.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 924 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:924. The commissioner shall collect a late filing fee of seven hundred five dollars ($705) eight hundred dollars ($800) from any admitted insurer that fails to make and file in the commissioner’s office within the time prescribed by law any statements or stipulations required by this code. After the first month, the commissioner shall also collect a late filing fee of eight hundred forty-nine dollars ($849) nine hundred dollars ($900) for each and every month or fractional part of a month thereafter that the insurer continues to transact the business of insurance until those statements and stipulations are filed.